Utah statutes.
59-2-703.   Commission to assist county assessors -- Appraisers provided upon request -- Costs of services -- Contingency fee arrangements prohibited.

(1)  The commission shall, upon request and pursuant to mutual agreement, provide county assessors with technical assistance and appraisal aid.  It shall provide certified or licensed appraisers who, upon request of the county assessor and pursuant to mutual agreement, shall perform appraisals of property and other technical services as needed by the county assessor.  The costs of these services shall be computed by the commission upon the basis of the number of days of services rendered.  Each county shall pay to the commission 50% of the cost of the services which they receive.

(2) (a)  Both the commission and counties may contract with a private firm or an individual to conduct appraisals.

(b)  Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, the commission and counties may disclose the name of the taxpayer and the taxpayer's address to the contract appraiser.  A private appraiser is subject to the confidentiality requirements and penalty provisions provided in Title 63G, Chapter 2, Part 8, Remedies.

(c)  Neither the commission nor a county may contract with a private firm or an individual under a contingency fee arrangement to assess property or prosecute or defend an appeal.  An appraisal that has been prepared on a contingency fee basis may not be allowed in any proceeding before a county board of equalization or the commission.

